Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-139] Removal of designated or
appointed directors. (a) A designated director may be removed by an
amendment to the articles or bylaws deleting or changing the designation.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in the
articles or bylaws, an appointed director may be removed without cause by the
person appointing the director.

(c) The person removing the director shall do
so by giving written notice of the removal to the director, and either the
presiding officer of the board or the corporation's president or secretary.

(d) A removal is effective when the notice is
effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date. [L 2001, c 105,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next